Utah statutes.
59-2-1329.   Right to injunction limited.
This remedy supersedes the remedy of injunction and all other remedies which
might be invoked to prevent the collection of taxes alleged to be unlawfully
levied or demanded, unless the court finds that the remedy provided is
inadequate, in which case the injunctive proceedings under Section 59-2-1326
apply.
